Maine, session 132, LD153.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §3-B is enacted to read:
§3-B. Mooring on privately owned or leased land
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Emergency" means an unexpected adverse event that exposes a person to physical
harm if immediate action is not taken to prevent the harm or that exposes a watercraft
to likely damage if a mooring is not used.
B. "Owner or lessee" means a person or group of persons that have a legal interest in
a mooring or that have been granted rights of use of a mooring by the mooring's owner.
2. Permission required. A person may not secure a watercraft to a mooring owned or
leased by another person without permission of the owner or lessee.
3. Penalty. A person who violates subsection 2 commits a Class E crime if:
A. The person refuses or fails to immediately release a watercraft from a mooring upon
request of the owner or lessee and deprives the owner or lessee of use of the mooring;
B. The person leaves a watercraft unattended and secured to a mooring and deprives
the owner or lessee of the use of the mooring; or
C. The person damages or drags the mooring.
4. Restitution. In addition to any criminal penalty imposed for a violation of subsection
2, a court shall order a person who violates subsection 2 to pay restitution to the owner or
lessee of the mooring in an amount equal to any monetary expenses the owner or lessee
incurs as a result of the unauthorized use of the mooring.
5. Liability. An owner or lessee of a mooring is not liable for damages incurred by a
person resulting from that person's use of the mooring without permission of the owner or
lessee.
6. Affirmative defense. It is an affirmative defense to an alleged violation of
subsection 2 that:
A. A mooring is clearly marked in a manner indicating that it is a rental mooring, the
mooring is vacant at the time the person secures a watercraft to it and reasonable efforts
have been made to pay any mooring rental fee; or
B. A person secures a watercraft to a mooring during an emergency that is immediately
reported to a law enforcement agency.